Arkansas, session 2025, HB1199.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-18-317 is repealed.
6-18-317. Prohibited transfers.
(a) Boards of directors of local school districts are prohibited from
granting legal transfers under § 6-18-316 when:
(1) Either the resident district or the receiving district is
under a desegregation-related court order; and
(2) The transfer in question would violate the court order.
(b) Each form filed with the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education reporting a legal student transfer must be accompanied by an
affidavit signed by each member of both school district boards of directors
stating that the transfer does not violate the prohibition set forth in
subsection (a) of this section.
(c) If the transfer fails to comply with subsection (b) of this
section, the division shall withhold from each district state aid in an
*TNL100*
02-11-2025 14:05:03 TNL100

As Engrossed: S2/11/25 HB1199
amount equal to that to be generated by the student in question in the
respective districts.

/s/Barker
































02-11-2025 14:05:03 TNL100